Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.290

Appropriation for planning agency, board of adjustment.

The board shall provide the funds, equipment and accommodations necessary for the work of the planning agency. Such appropriations may include funds for joint ventures as set forth in RCW 36.70.180. The expenditures of the planning agency, exclusive of gifts, shall be within the amounts appropriated for the respective purposes. The provisions herein for financing the work of the planning agencies shall also apply to the board of adjustment and the zoning adjustor.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.290. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 29.]